test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-13alonw_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - alonõ: # Noun (13) alonõ 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     alonõ+N+Sg+Nom: alonõ
     alonõ+N+Sg+Gen: alodsõ
     alonõ+N+Sg+Par: alost
     alonõ+N+Sg+Ill: alotsõhe
     alonõ+N+Sg+Ine: alotsõn
     alonõ+N+Sg+Ade: alotsõl
     alonõ+N+Sg+Abl: alotsõlt
     alonõ+N+Sg+Tra: alotsõs
     alonõ+N+Sg+Ter: alotsõniq
     alonõ+N+Sg+Abe: alotsõldaq
     alonõ+N+Sg+Com: alotsõgaq
     alonõ+N+Pl+Nom: alodsõq
     alonõ+N+Pl+Gen: alotsidõ
     alonõ+N+Pl+Par: alotsit
     alonõ+N+Pl+Ill: alotsihe
     alonõ+N+Pl+Ine: alotsin
     alonõ+N+Pl+Ela: alotsist
     alonõ+N+Pl+All: alotsilõ
     alonõ+N+Pl+Ade: alotsil
     alonõ+N+Pl+Abl: alotsilt
     alonõ+N+Pl+Tra: alotsis
     alonõ+N+Pl+Ter: alotsiniq
     alonõ+N+Pl+Abe: alotsildaq
     alonõ+N+Pl+Com: alotsidõgaq
